District of Columbia statutes.
2-1905

Intermediary interpreter to be used.

In any proceeding involving a hearing-impaired person in which a qualified interpreter is unable to render a satisfactory interpretation without the aid of an intermediary interpreter, the hearing-impaired person involved may be permitted by the appointing authority to retain another person to act as an intermediary interpreter to assist the qualified interpreter during the proceedings.

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 6, 34 DCR 7426

History

1981 Ed., § 31-2705.

Prior Codifications